pt-PT: Software > Software de computador > Ferramentas de programação e compiladores: Ferramentas de desenvolvimento de software
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์คอมพิวเตอร์ > เครื่องมือคอมไพล์และเขียนโปรแกรม: เครื่องมือพัฒนาซอฟต์แวร์
pt-BR: Software > Software de computador > Compiladores e ferramentas de programação: Ferramentas de desenvolvimento de software
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Kompiuterių programinė įranga > Kompiliatoriai ir programavimo įrankiai: Programinės įrangos kūrimo įrankiai
hr-HR: Softver > Računalni softver > Kompilatori i alati za programiranje: Alati za razvoj softvera
it: Software > Software per computer > Strumenti compilazione/programmazione: Strumenti di sviluppo per software
sv: Programvara > Datorprogramvara > Kompilatorer och programmeringsverktyg: Verktyg för programvaruutveckling
fi: Ohjelmisto > Tietokoneohjelmisto > Ohjelmointikielen käännös- ja ohjelmointityökalut: Ohjelmistojen kehitystyökalut
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Računalniška programska oprema > Prevajalniki in programska orodja: Orodja za razvoj programske opreme
nb: Programvare > Dataprogramvare > Compilere og programmeringsverktøy: Programvareutviklingsverktøy
zh-CN: 软件 > 电脑软件 > 编程工具/编译器: 软件开发工具
en: Software > Computer Software > Compilers & Programming Tools: Software Development Tools
hu: Szoftver > Számítógépes szoftver > Fordítók és programozási eszközök: Szoftverfejlesztő eszközök
ja: ソフトウェア > PCソフト > コンパイラ・プログラミングツール: ソフトウェア開発ツール
fr: Logiciels > Logiciels informatiques > Outils de compilation et de programmation: Outils de développement de logiciels
cs: Software > Počítačový software > Kompilátory a vývojářské nástroje: Nástroje pro vývoj softwaru
tr: Yazılım > Bilgisayar Yazılımları > Derleme ve Programlama Araçları: Yazılım Geliştirme Araçları
pl: Oprogramowanie > Programy komputerowe > Kompilatory i narzędzia programistyczne: Narzędzia do tworzenia oprogramowania
zh-TW: 軟體 > 電腦軟體 > 編譯器/軟體開發工具: 軟體開發工具
ko: 소프트웨어 > 컴퓨터 소프트웨어 > 컴파일러/프로그래밍 도구: 소프트웨어 개발 도구
ru: Программное обеспечение > Программное обеспечение для компьютеров > Компиляторы и инструменты программирования: Средства разработки программного обеспечения
el: Λογισμικό > Λογισμικό υπολογιστών > Μεταγλωττιστές & εργαλεία προγραμματισμού: Εργαλεία ανάπτυξης λογισμικού
ro-RO: Software > Software de calculator > Compilatoare și instrumente de programare: Instrumente de dezvoltare de software
sk-SK: Softvér > Počítačový softvér > Kompilátory a programovacie nástroje: Nástroje na vývoj softvéru
bg-BG: Софтуер > Компютърен софтуер > Компилатори и инструменти за програмиране: Инструменти за разработка на софтуер
vi: Phần mềm > Phần mềm máy tính > Trình biên dịch & công cụ lập trình: Công cụ phát triển phần mềm
nl: Software > Computersoftware > Compilers en programmeerhulpmiddelen: Hulpmiddelen voor softwareontwikkeling
da: Software > Computersoftware > Compilere og programmeringsværktøjer: Softwareudviklingsværktøjer
es: Software > Software informático > Herramientas de compilación y programación: Herramientas de desarrollo de software
de: Software > Computersoftware > Compiler & Programmierungstools: Softwareentwicklungstools